Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2210
Practice of nursing, defined.

Practice of nursing means the performance for compensation or gratuitously of any act expressing judgment or skill based upon a systematized body of nursing knowledge. Such acts include the identification of and intervention in actual or potential health problems of individuals, families, or groups, which acts are directed toward maintaining health status, preventing illness, injury, or infirmity, improving health status, and providing care supportive to or restorative of life and well-being through nursing assessment and through the execution of nursing care and of diagnostic or therapeutic regimens prescribed by any person lawfully authorized to prescribe. Each nurse is directly accountable and responsible to the consumer for the quality of nursing care rendered. Licensed nurses may use the services of unlicensed individuals to provide assistance with personal care and activities of daily living.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 766.